Washington statutes.
RCW 7.84.100

Monetary penalties.

(1) A person found to have committed an infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed $500 for each offense unless specifically authorized by statute.

(2) The supreme court may prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated infractions. The legislature requests the supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation. Except as otherwise provided, the maximum penalty imposed by the schedule shall be $500 per infraction and the minimum penalty imposed by the schedule shall be $10 per infraction. This schedule may be periodically reviewed by the legislature and is subject to its revision.

(3) Penalties for violations of RCW 70A.200.060 that are natural resource infractions are as follows:

(a) Up to $250 for a person found liable of littering between one cubic foot and one cubic yard of material;

(b) Up to $750 for a person found liable of littering more than one cubic yard and less than seven cubic yards of material;

(c) Up to $1,000 for a person found liable of littering between seven and 10 cubic yards of material.

(4) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter, it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time, the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which the penalty may be paid.

(5)(a) The county treasurer shall remit 75 percent of the money received under RCW 79A.80.080(5) to the state treasurer.

(b) Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited in the recreation access pass account established under RCW 79A.80.090. The balance of the noninterest money received by the county treasurer must be deposited in the county current expense fund.

[ 2024 c 231 s 3; 2020 c 268 s 1; 2012 c 262 s 2; 1987 c 380 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—2024 c 231: See note following RCW 70A.200.060.